District of Columbia statutes.
50-1731.10

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-124, § 10, 51 DCR 1541

History